Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE D. THE TEXAS A & M UNIVERSITY SYSTEM

CHAPTER 89. THE TEXAS A&M UNIVERSITY SYSTEM HEALTH SCIENCE CENTER

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 89.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System.

(2) "Health science center" means The Texas A&M University System Health Science Center.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 8.01, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 89.002. COMPOSITION. (a) The Texas A&M University System Health Science Center is composed of the following component institutions, agencies, and programs under the management and control of the board:

(1) The Texas A&M University System Health Science Center College of Medicine;

(2) The Texas A&M University System Health Science Center Baylor College of Dentistry;

(3) The Texas A&M University System Health Science Center School of Rural Public Health;

(4) The Texas A&M University System Health Science Center Irma Lerma Rangel College of Pharmacy;

(5) The Texas A&M University System Health Science Center College of Nursing;

(6) The Texas A&M University System Health Science Center School of Graduate Studies;

(7) The Texas A&M University System Health Science Center Institute of Biosciences and Technology;

(8) The Texas A&M University System Health Science Center Coastal Bend Health Education Center;

(9) The Texas A&M University System Health Science Center South Texas Health Center; and

(10) The Texas A&M University System Health Science Center Rural and Community Health Institute.

(b) The Texas A&M University System Health Science Center Baylor College of Dentistry may use the name "Baylor" only:

(1) in accordance with:

(A) a license agreement between the health science center and Baylor University; or

(B) other written approval from Baylor University; or

(2) as otherwise permitted by law.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 8.01, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 89.003. MANDATORY VENUE. (a) Venue for a suit filed against the health science center, any component institution, agency, or program of the health science center, or any officer or employee of the health science center is in Brazos County.

(b) This section does not waive any defense to or immunity from suit or liability that may be asserted by an entity or individual described by this section.

(c) In case of a conflict between this section and any other law, this section controls.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 8.01, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 89.004. EXPENDITURE OF STATE FUNDS. The board is authorized to expend funds appropriated to it by the legislature for all lawful purposes of the health science center and its component institutions, agencies, and programs as well as funds available under the authority of Section 18, Article VII, Texas Constitution, for the purposes expressed in that section for the support of the health science center and its component institutions, agencies, and programs.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 8.01, eff. June 17, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER B. THE TEXAS A&M UNIVERSITY SYSTEM HEALTH SCIENCE CENTER IRMA LERMA RANGEL COLLEGE OF PHARMACY

Sec. 89.051. THE TEXAS A&M UNIVERSITY SYSTEM HEALTH SCIENCE CENTER IRMA LERMA RANGEL COLLEGE OF PHARMACY. (a) The board shall maintain a college of pharmacy as a component of the health science center.

(b) The college shall be known as The Texas A&M University System Health Science Center Irma Lerma Rangel College of Pharmacy, and the primary building in which the school is operated shall be located in Kleberg County and must include "Irma Rangel" in its official name.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1049 (S.B. 5), Sec. 8.01, eff. June 17, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 485 (H.B. 2561), Sec. 21, eff. September 1, 2017.